Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.040

Coordination of policies—Report.

It shall be the duty of the school directors' association (1) to take such action as the association deems advisable to effect a coordination of policymaking, control, and management of the school districts of the state; and (2) to prepare and submit to the superintendent of public instruction annually, and oftener if deemed advisable by the association, reports and recommendations respecting the aforesaid matters and any other matters which in the judgment of the association pertain to an increase in the efficiency of the common school system.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.040. Prior: 1947 c 169 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4709-23. Formerly RCW 28A.61.040, 28.58.350.]